Florida, session 2026, HB1477.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (c) through (n) of subsection (4) of
section 322.142, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
paragraphs (d) through (o), respectively, a new paragraph (c) is
added to that subsection, and subsections (5) through (8) are
added to that section, to read:
322.142 Color photographic or digital imaged licenses.—
(4) The department may maintain a film negative or print
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1477-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1477 2026
file. The department shall maintain a record of the digital
image and signature of the licensees, together with other data
required by the department for identification and retrieval.
Reproductions from the file or digital record are exempt from
the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and may be made and issued only:
(c) For the purpose of fraud prevention, identity
verification, or ensuring the integrity and security of
individual identities, with the licensee's consent, for use by:
1. A state agency pursuant to an interagency agreement
with the department.
2. A third party that has entered into a contract with the
department to perform identity verification services for persons
or entities, regulated by a state agency, pursuant to standards
and safeguards established by the department.
(5) An identity verification service provider may use
department data in a manner consistent with this section if such
data remains in the department's possession.
(6) Any revenue generated as a result of an agreement
authorized by this section shall be deposited into the Highway
Safety Operating Trust Fund.
(7) An identify verification service provider may not
retain Internet protocol addresses, geolocation data, or other
information that describes the location, computer, computer
system, or computer network from which an applicant accesses the
system.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1477-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1477 2026
(8) A third party may not store or sell images,
signatures, or data used pursuant to this section without the
licensee's consent.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1477-00